Utah statutes.
17-23-19.   County permitted to establish Public Land Corner Preservation
Fund -- Use of fund -- Fee schedule for filing maps.
(1)  The county legislative body may establish by ordinance a fund to be known
as the Public Land Corner Preservation Fund. Money generated for the fund
shall be used only to pay expenses incurred and authorized by the county
surveyor in the establishment, reestablishment, and maintenance of corners of
government surveys pursuant to the powers and duties provided under Title 17,
Chapter 23, and Title 57, Chapter 10.
(2)  The county legislative body may by ordinance establish a fee schedule for
filing maps in the county surveyor's office of surveys filed under Section
17-23-17, subdivisions, road dedication plats, and other property plats. All
money collected under this subsection shall be deposited with the county
treasurer to be credited to the Public Land Corner Preservation Fund.
